Washington statutes.
RCW 10.92.010

Definitions.

The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "General authority Washington peace officer" means an officer authorized to enforce the criminal and traffic laws of the state of Washington generally.

(2) "Tribal police officer" means any person in the employ of one of the federally recognized sovereign tribal governments, whose traditional lands and territories lie within the borders of the state of Washington, to enforce the criminal laws of that government.

[ 2008 c 224 s 1.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2008 c 224: "This act takes effect July 1, 2008." [ 2008 c 224 s 4.]